Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. Creation of Marriage

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

52 Am. Jur.2d Marriage §§ 13 to 92.

§ 20-1-101.
Marriage a civil contract.

Marriage is a civil contract between a male and a female person to which the consent of the parties capable of contracting is essential.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1541; R.S. 1899, § 2955; C.S. 1910, § 3891; C.S. 1920, § 4955; R.S. 1931, § 68-101; C.S. 1945, § 50-101; W.S. 1957, § 20-1; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-101

.

Various provisions of marriage statute constitute complete code on form and requisites

of marriage, and hence there is no room for the contention that statutory provisions in contravention of common law must be strictly construed. In re Roberts' Estate, 58 Wyo. 438, 133 P.2d 492,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1943).

Common-law marriages invalid. —

Common-law marriages entered into in Wyoming are not valid. In re Reeves' Estate, 58 Wyo. 432, 133 P.2d 503,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1943).

Neither marriage statutes nor public policy would justify supreme court in holding that common-law marriages are valid and such “marriage” does not give to an alleged common-law widow share in the deceased's estate. In re Roberts' Estate, 58 Wyo. 438, 133 P.2d 492,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1943).

Jurisdiction over same-sex divorce action. —

District court had subject-matter jurisdiction pursuant to Wyo. Const. art. 5, §§ 1, 10 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-104

over a divorce action involving a same-sex couple legally married in Canada. Recognizing the marriage under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-1-111

for this limited purpose was not inconsistent with the definition of marriage in this section.
Christiansen v. Christiansen, 2011 WY 90, 253 P.3d 153,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited in

Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Combs v. Sherry-Combs, 865 P.2d 50,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mental capacity to marry, 82 ALR2d 1040.

Recognition by forum state of marriage which, although invalid where contracted, would have been valid if contracted within forum state, 82 ALR3d 1240.

Marriage between persons of same sex—United States and Canadian cases, 1 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 1.

§ 20-1-102.
Minimum marriageable age; exception; parental consent.

At the time of marriage the parties shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age except as otherwise provided.

All marriages involving a person under sixteen (16) years of age are prohibited and voidable, unless before contracting the marriage a judge of a court of record in Wyoming approves the marriage and authorizes the county clerk to issue a license therefor.

When either party is a minor, no license shall be granted without the verbal consent, if present, and written consent, if absent, of the father, mother, guardian or person having the care and control of the minor. Written consent shall be proved by the testimony of at least one (1) competent witness.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, §§ 2, 5; R.S. 1887, §§ 1542, 1545; R.S. 1899, §§ 2956, 2959; C.S. 1910, §§ 3892, 3895; C.S. 1920, §§ 4956, 4959; R.S. 1931, §§ 68-102, 68-105; C.S. 1945, §§ 50-102, 50-105; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-2, 20-3; Laws 1975, ch. 4, § 1; ch. 61, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 20-2.1; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-102

.

Cross references. —

As to marriage being voidable when either party is under age of consent, see §

20-2-101

.

Stated

in

Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 20-1-103.
License; required.

Before solemnization of any marriage in this state, a marriage license shall be obtained from a Wyoming county clerk.

Application for a marriage license shall be made by one (1) of the parties to the marriage before the license is issued. Upon receipt of an application, the county clerk shall ascertain by the testimony of a competent witness and the applicant, the names, the social security numbers of the parties who have valid social security numbers, residences and ages of the parties and whether there is any legal impediment to the parties entering into the marriage contract according to the laws of the state of their residence. The clerk shall enter the facts ascertained in a book kept by him for that purpose, except for the social security numbers which shall be provided to the state office of vital records and not made a part of the county public record. He may issue a license to marry and shall date the license on the date of issuance except as otherwise provided.

Unless there is an order to waive the requirements of this section by a judge of a court of record in the county pursuant to W.S.

20-1-105

, the clerk shall refuse to issue a license if:

Either of the parties is legally incompetent to enter into a marriage contract according to the law of this state; or

There is any legal impediment; or

Either party is a minor and the consent of a parent or guardian has not been given.

A marriage license obtained from a Wyoming county clerk shall expire one (1) year from the date the license was issued if the parties have not solemnized the marriage. The expiration date shall be shown on the marriage license. Upon expiration of a marriage license, the parties shall apply for and obtain a new marriage license before solemnization of their marriage in this state.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, §§ 4, 6, 7; R.S. 1887, §§ 1544, 1546, 1547; R.S. 1899, §§ 2958, 2960, 2961; Laws 1907, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 3894, 3896, 3897; C.S. 1920, §§ 4958, 4960, 4961; Laws 1931, ch. 99, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 68-104, 68-106, 68-107; Laws 1935, ch. 3, § 1; 1945, ch. 144, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 50-104, 50-106, 50-107; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-4 to 20-6; Laws 1975, ch. 61, § 2; 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-103

; Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 2; 1998, ch. 90, § 1; 2009, ch. 40, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d).

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 144, Laws 1945, repealed § 68-111, R.S. 1931 (§ 11, ch. 81, C.L. 1876), relating to return of performance of ceremony, as being in conflict with § 24, ch. 115, Laws 1941 (§ 35-71).

Provision mandatory. —

This section requires that previous to the solemnization of a marriage a license for that purpose “must” be obtained. The mandatory requirement of a license is a legislative declaration of “public policy” which should be enforced by the courts and precludes the formation of the marriage tie in Wyoming by a common-law marriage. In re Trent's Claim, 68 Wyo. 146, 231 P.2d 180,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1951), overruled, Bowers v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

Common-law marriages invalid. —

Neither marriage statutes nor public policy would justify supreme court in holding that common-law marriages are valid. In re Roberts' Estate, 58 Wyo. 438, 133 P.2d 492,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of solemnized marriage as affected by defective license or license wrongfully issued or obtained, 61 ALR2d 847.

§ 20-1-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 22, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 160, §§ 15 and 16, related to serological tests required prior to obtaining a license.

§ 20-1-105.
Judge may order license issued.

If any county clerk refuses to issue a license to marry, or in case of circumstances arising which would necessitate the waiver of any one (1) or more of the requirements of W.S.

20-1-102

and 20-1-103(b) and (c), either applicant for the license may apply to the district court of the county for the issuance of a license without compliance with one (1) or more of those requirements. If the judge finds that a license should be issued, or such circumstances exist that it is proper that any one (1) or more of the requirements should be waived, the judge may order in writing the issuance of the license. Upon the order of the judge being filed with the county clerk, the county clerk shall issue the license at the time specified in the order. No fee or court costs shall be charged or taxed for the order.

If either party is under sixteen (16) years of age, the parents or guardians may apply to any judge of a court of record in the county of residence of the minor for an order authorizing the marriage and directing the issuance of a marriage license. If the judge believes it advisable, he shall enter an order authorizing the marriage and directing the county clerk to issue a license. Upon filing of a certified copy of the order with the county clerk, the county clerk shall issue a license and endorse thereon the fact of the issuance of the order. No person authorized to perform marriage ceremonies in Wyoming shall perform any marriage ceremony if either party is under the age specified by this subsection unless the license contains the endorsement.

Before issuing the order provided by this section the judge may require affidavits or other proof of the competency of the parties or of any other facts necessitating or making the order advisable. The order may be in substantially the following form:

I
. . . . . , the undersigned
. . . . . , a judge of the
. . . . .
court, a court of record in and for
. . . . .
county, Wyoming, hereby order that a marriage license may issue to
. . . . .
of
. . . . .
(address) and
. . . . .
of . . . . .
(address) on the
. . . . .
day of
. . . . .
(year)
. . . . .
Date:
. . . . .

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-8.1, 20-8.2; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-105

; Laws 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1.

§ 20-1-106.
Who may solemnize marriage; form of ceremony.

Every district or circuit court judge, district court commissioner, supreme court justice, magistrate and every licensed or ordained minister of the gospel, bishop, priest or rabbi, or other qualified person acting in accordance with the traditions or rites for the solemnization of marriage of any religion, denomination or religious society, may perform the ceremony of marriage in this state.

In the solemnization of marriage no particular form is required, except that the parties shall solemnly declare in the presence of the person performing the ceremony and at least two (2) attending witnesses that they take each other as husband and wife.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, §§ 8, 9; R.S. 1887, §§ 1548, 1549; R.S. 1899, §§ 2962, 2963; Laws 1907, ch. 37, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 3898, 3899; C.S. 1920, §§ 4962, 4963; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 76; R.S. 1931, §§ 68-108, 68-109; C.S. 1945, §§ 50-110, 50-111; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-10, 20-11; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-106

; Laws 1999, ch. 79, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to filing of record of marriage with state registrar of vital records, see §

35-1-422

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “justice of the peace” following “supreme court justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Statute mandatory. —

The former provision that “in any case there shall be at least two witnesses besides the minister or magistrate present at the ceremony” leaves little room for construction, is mandatory, and establishes a legislative public policy which courts will enforce. In re Roberts' Estate, 58 Wyo. 438, 133 P.2d 492,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1943).

Cited in

Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017); Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 20-1-107.
Certificate of marriage.

When a marriage is solemnized, the person performing the ceremony shall give one (1) of the parties a certificate under his hand and signed by the witnesses to the marriage, specifying the names, ages and place of residence of the parties married, the names and residences of at least two (2) witnesses who were present at the marriage, and the time and place thereof.

The county clerk of each county in the state shall record all returns of marriages in a book kept for that purpose within one (1) month after receipt.

The original certificate and record of marriage made by the person performing the ceremony and the record thereof or a certified copy of the certificate or record is admissible in all courts and places as presumptive evidence of the fact of the marriage.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, §§ 10, 12, 16; R.S. 1887, §§ 1550, 1552, 1556; R.S. 1899, §§ 2964, 2966, 2970; C.S. 1910, §§ 3900, 3902, 3906; C.S. 1920, §§ 4964, 4966, 4970; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 77; R.S. 1931, §§ 68-110, 68-112, 68-116; C.S. 1945, §§ 50-112, 50-113, 50-117; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-12 to 20-14; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-107

.

Failure to record did not invalidate marriage. —

A marriage, regularly solemnized, was held valid where license was issued but not recorded. Connors v. Connors, 5 Wyo. 433, 40 P. 966,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1895).

§ 20-1-108.
Offenses relating to marriage generally.

If the county clerk neglects to record a marriage certificate, or if any person performs a marriage ceremony knowing that he is not legally authorized to do so or knowing of any legal impediment to the proposed marriage, he is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment for not exceeding one (1) year.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 1553; R.S. 1899, § 2967; C.S. 1910, § 3903; C.S. 1920, § 4967; R.S. 1931, § 68-113; C.S. 1945, § 50-114; W.S. 1957, § 20-15; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-108

.

§ 20-1-109.
When marriage solemnized by unauthorized person valid.

No marriage solemnized in any manner authorized by W.S.

20-1-106

, shall be deemed or adjudged to be void, nor is the validity of the marriage in any way affected because of a lack of jurisdiction or authority of the person performing the ceremony of marriage if the marriage is consummated with a full belief on the part of the persons so married, or either of them, that the person performing the ceremony was lawfully authorized to do so.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 1554; R.S. 1899, § 2968; C.S. 1910, § 3904; C.S. 1920, § 4968; R.S. 1931, § 68-114; C.S. 1945, § 50-115; W.S. 1957, § 20-16; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-109

; Laws 1999, ch. 79, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of marriage as affected by lack of legal authority of person solemnizing it, 13 ALR4th 1323.

§ 20-1-110.
Marriage ceremony according to rites and customs of religious societies or assemblies.

Any religious society or religious assembly may perform the ceremony of marriage in this state according to the rites and customs of the society or assembly. The clerk or keeper of the minutes, proceedings or other book of the society or assembly wherein the marriage occurs, or if none then the moderator or person presiding in the society or assembly, shall make out and transmit to the county clerk of the county a certificate of the marriage.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 1555; R.S. 1899, § 2969; C.S. 1910, § 3905; C.S. 1920, § 4969; R.S. 1931, § 68-115; C.S. 1945, § 50-116; W.S. 1957, § 20-20; Laws 1967, ch. 108, § 1; 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-110

.

§ 20-1-111.
Foreign marriages.

All marriage contracts which are valid by the laws of the country in which contracted are valid in this state.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 17; R.S. 1887, § 1557; R.S. 1899, § 2971; C.S. 1910, § 3907; C.S. 1920, § 4971; R.S. 1931, § 68-117; C.S. 1945, § 50-118; W.S. 1957, § 20-21; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-1-111

.

This section merely declares the common-law rule.

Bowers v. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Workmen's Comp. Div., 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

Limited recognition of common-law marriages. —

A common-law marriage, valid in the state in which it is contracted, is valid in Wyoming for purposes of receipt of benefits under our worker's compensation laws. Jim's Water Serv. v. Eayrs, 590 P.2d 1346,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1979), limited, State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990).

Common-law marriage recognized. —

See Compton v. Davis Oil Co., 607 F. Supp. 1221, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20337 (D. Wyo. 1985).

Remarriage after divorce. —

Remarriage by a woman within one year after securing a divorce within the state, contracted outside the state and with a resident of the state, who had gone out of the state to evade the prohibition of former C.S. 1910, § 3951, against such remarriage, was valid, since the latter section did not make such marriage invalid, but merely imposed a punishment on the parties contracting it. Hoagland v. Hoagland, 27 Wyo. 178, 193 P. 843,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1920).

Jurisdiction over same-sex divorce action. —

District court had subject-matter jurisdiction pursuant to Wyo. Const. art. 5, §§ 1, 10 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-104

over a divorce action involving a same-sex couple legally married in Canada. Recognizing the marriage under this section for this limited purpose was not inconsistent with the definition of marriage in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-1-101

.
Christiansen v. Christiansen, 2011 WY 90, 253 P.3d 153,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2011).

Discretion of court. —

District court ruled that each party to the divorce should pay his or her own attorney fees; this decision was not challenged on appeal, and there was no reason to deviate from the district court's formula and award the mother attorney fees.
Opitz v. Opitz, 2007 WY 207, 173 P.3d 405,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 2007).

§ 20-1-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 117, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 22, § 1, related to the physician's certificate and rubella and Rh test required prior to issuing a marriage license.

§ 20-1-113.
Legitimacy of children presumed.

The legitimacy of all children conceived or born during the marriage is rebuttably presumed pursuant to W.S.

14-2-504

.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 22; R.S. 1887, § 1588; R.S. 1899, § 3005; C.S. 1910, § 3941; C.S. 1920, § 5007; R.S. 1931, § 35-125; C.S. 1945, § 3-5923; W.S. 1957, § 20-67; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-117

; W.S. 1977, §

20-2-117

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 4; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presumption of legitimacy of child born after annulment, divorce or separation, 46 ALR3d 158.

Legitimation by marriage to natural father of child born during mother's marriage to another, 80 ALR3d 219.